Washington statutes.
RCW 42.40.070

Summary of chapter available to employees.

A written summary of this chapter and procedures for reporting improper governmental actions established by the auditor's office shall be made available by each department or agency of state government to each employee upon entering public employment. Such notices may be in agency internal newsletters, included with paychecks or stubs, sent via electronic mail to all employees, or sent by other means that are cost-effective and reach all employees of the government level, division, or subdivision. Employees shall be notified by each department or agency of state government each year of the procedures and protections under this chapter. The annual notices shall include a list of public officials, as defined in RCW 42.40.020, authorized to receive whistleblower reports. The list of public officials authorized to receive whistleblower reports shall also be prominently displayed in all agency offices.

[ 2008 c 266 s 5; 1989 c 284 s 5; 1982 c 208 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2008 c 266: See note following RCW 42.40.020.